Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
CHAPTER 4A Department of Juvenile Justice

Administrative rules and regulations.

Rules of general applicability, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Juvenile Justice, Chapter 97-1.

Administrative revocations of juvenile community placement, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Juvenile Justice, Chapter 97-2.

49-4A-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Board” means the Board of Juvenile Justice.

“Child in need of services” means any child so adjudged under Article 5 of Chapter 11 of Title 15.

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of juvenile justice.

“Delinquent child” means any child so adjudged under Article 6 of Chapter 11 of Title 15.

“Department” means the Department of Juvenile Justice.

“Detention assessment” means an actuarial tool, approved by the board and validated on a targeted population, used to make detention decisions and that identifies and calculates specific factors that are likely to indicate a child’s risk to public safety pending adjudication and the likelihood that such child will appear for juvenile proceedings for the act causing the detention decision to be made.

“Evidence based programs or practices” means programs, practices, procedures, and policies that scientific research demonstrates a likelihood to prevent or reduce juvenile delinquency or recidivism.

“Juvenile detention facility” means hardware secure residential institutions or community residential locations operated by or on behalf of the department and may include youth development centers, regional youth detention centers, group homes, emergency shelters, wilderness or outdoor therapeutic programs, or other facilities that provide 24 hour care in a residential setting.

“Recidivism” means a conviction or adjudication of delinquency for an offense or crime committed within three years of being placed on probation or being discharged or released from a juvenile detention facility.

“Risk and needs assessment” means an actuarial tool, approved by the board and validated on a targeted population, that identifies and calculates specific factors that predict a child’s likelihood of recidivating and identifies criminal risk factors that, when properly addressed, can reduce such child’s likelihood of recidivating.

“Risk assessment” means an actuarial tool, approved by the board and validated on a targeted population, that identifies and calculates specific factors that predict a child’s likelihood of recidivating.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 24; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, § 4; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 3-1/HB 242.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, added paragraph (2); redesignated former paragraphs (2) through (4) as present paragraphs (3) through (5), respectively; substituted “ ‘Delinquent child’ means any child so adjudged under Article 6” for “ ‘Delinquent or unruly child or youth’ means any person so adjudged under Article 1” in paragraph (4); and added paragraphs (6) through (11). See editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

49-4A-2.
Board of Juvenile Justice created; appointments; terms; vacancies; chairperson; per diem and expenses; responsibilities and duties.

There is created a Board of Juvenile Justice which shall establish the general policy to be followed by the Department of Juvenile Justice created in this chapter. The Board of Juvenile Justice shall be the successor entity to the Board of Children and Youth Services and the change is intended to be one of name only. The board shall consist of 15 members, with at least one but not more than two from each congressional district in the state, appointed by the Governor and confirmed by the Senate. The Governor shall make such appointments with a view toward achieving minority representation, representation of women, and equitable geographic representation on the board.

The Governor shall designate the initial terms of the members of the board as follows: three members shall be appointed for one year; three members shall be appointed for two years; three members shall be appointed for three years; three members shall be appointed for four years; and three members shall be appointed for five years. Thereafter, all succeeding appointments shall be for five-year terms from the expiration of the previous term.

Vacancies in office shall be filled by appointment by the Governor in the same manner as the appointment to the position on the board which becomes vacant, and the appointment shall be submitted to the Senate for confirmation at the next session of the General Assembly. An appointment to fill a vacancy, other than by expiration of a term of office, shall be for the balance of the unexpired term.

There shall be a chairperson of the board, elected by and from the membership of the board, who shall be the presiding officer of the board.

The members of the board shall receive per diem and expenses as shall be set and approved by the Office of Planning and Budget and in conformance with rates and allowances set for members of other state boards.

The board shall:

Provide leadership in developing programs to successfully rehabilitate delinquent children committed to the state’s custody;

Provide technical assistance to private and public entities for prevention programs for children at risk;

Ensure that detention assessment, risk assessment, and risk and needs assessment instruments that are utilized by intake personnel and courts are developed in consultation with the Governor’s Office for Children and Families, the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council, and the Council of Juvenile Court Judges and ensure that such instruments are validated at least every five years;

Adopt rules and regulations governing the management and treatment of children committed to the department to ensure that evidence based programs or practices, including the use of a risk and needs assessment and any other method the board deems appropriate, guide decisions related to placing a committed child in a facility or into the community, preparing a child’s release into the community, and managing children probationers in the community;

Require the department to collect and analyze data and performance outcomes, including, but not limited to, data collected and maintained pursuant to subsection (n) of Code Section 49-4A-8 and prepare an annual report regarding such information which shall be submitted to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and the chairpersons of the House Committee on Judiciary Non-civil and the Senate Judiciary Committee; and

Adopt rules and regulations governing the transfer of children who are at least 17 years of age and are released from restrictive custody due to an adjudication for a Class A designated felony act or Class B designated felony act, as such terms are defined in Code Section 15-11-2, to the Department of Community Supervision to ensure balanced attention to the protection of the community, the imposition of accountability, and the development of competencies to enable each child to become a responsible and productive member of the community, taking into consideration a child’s level of participation in the department’s educational, vocational, and other services prior to such release.

The board shall perform duties required of it by this chapter and shall, in addition thereto, be responsible for promulgation of all rules and regulations not in conflict with this chapter that may be necessary and appropriate to the administration of the department, to the accomplishment of the purposes of this chapter, and to the performance of the duties and functions of the department as set forth in this chapter.

The board shall establish rules and regulations for the government, operation, and maintenance of all training schools, facilities, and institutions now or hereafter under the jurisdiction and control of the department, bearing in mind at all times that the purpose for existence and operation of such schools, facilities, and institutions and all activities carried on therein shall be to carry out the rehabilitative program provided for by this chapter and to restore and build up the self-respect and self-reliance of children and youths lodged therein so as to qualify and equip them for good citizenship and honorable employment.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 24; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, § 5; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 3-2/HB 242; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 49/SB 340; Ga. L. 2015, p. 890, § 6/HB 263; Ga. L. 2016, p. 443, § 12-1/SB 367.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, rewrote subsection (b). See editor’s note for applicability.

The 2014 amendment,

effective April 29, 2014, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “Senate Judiciary Committee” for “Senate State Judiciary Committee” at the end of paragraph (b)(5).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted “, the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council,” in paragraph (b)(3).

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in subsection (b), deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (b)(4), substituted “; and” for a period at the end of paragraph (b)(5), and added paragraph (b)(6).

Code Commission notes.

As enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 24, this Code section did not contain a subsection (b). Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, subsections (c), (d), and (e) were redesignated as present subsections (b), (c), and (d), respectively.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 139 (2016).

49-4A-3.
Department of Juvenile Justice created; commissioner of juvenile justice; organization and operation of department.

There is created the Department of Juvenile Justice and the position of commissioner of juvenile justice. The commissioner shall be the chief administrative officer of the department and shall be both appointed and removed by the board, subject to the approval of the Governor. The commissioner of human services shall not also serve as the commissioner of juvenile justice. Subject to the general policy and rules and regulations of the board, the commissioner shall supervise, direct, account for, organize, plan, administer, and execute the functions of the department.

The department shall provide for supervision, detention, and rehabilitation of delinquent children committed to the state’s custody. The department shall also be authorized to operate prevention programs and to provide assistance to local public and private entities with prevention programs for children at risk. In lieu of commitment, the department shall be authorized to provide for specialized treatment for children adjudicated for delinquent acts involving sexual offenses or controlled substances and who may have behavior disorders. The department’s organization, operation, and implementation shall be based on the following:

Development of a comprehensive continuum of service options using evidence based programs or practices through flexible funding to allow providers to respond to the unique needs and capabilities of individual children and families;

Services implemented so that each child and family served can have a personal relationship with staff, providers, and workers, which staff, providers, and workers shall be trained and treated as professionals, have a range of multidisciplinary skills, and have manageable caseloads;

Services shall be based on evidence based programs or practices and be community centered and responsive to local needs with state and local and public and private entities forming cooperative partnerships that enhance informal support systems for families;

Systems that are accountable, with desired outcomes specified, results measured and evaluated, and cost-efficient options maximized;

Intersystem communication and collaboration that are encouraged and facilitated through coordination of systems so that gaps and unnecessary duplications in planning, funding, and providing services are eliminated;

Being consumer driven and responsive to the changing needs of individual communities; and

Encouraging the central location of various services whenever possible.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 24; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, § 6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 3-3/HB 242.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, in subsection (a), deleted the former second sentence, which read: “The Department of Juvenile Justice shall be the successor entity to the Department of Children and Youth Services and the change is intended to be one of name only; and the commissioner of juvenile justice shall be the successor to the commissioner of children and youth services and the change is intended to be one of name only.”, substituted “department” for “Department of Juvenile Justice” in the second and last sentences, substituted “shall not” for “may not” in the third sentence, and deleted “of juvenile justice” following “the commissioner” in the last sentence; in subsection (b), in the introductory paragraph, substituted “delinquent children” for “juvenile delinquents” in the first sentence, substituted “children” for “juveniles” in the second sentence, and rewrote the third sentence, which read: “Additionally, the department will be authorized to provide for specialized treatment for juvenile offenders, in lieu of commitment, who have been found to be sex offenders or drug abusers and who may have behavior disorders”; inserted “using evidence based programs or practices” in paragraph (b)(1); inserted “based on evidence based programs or practices and be” in paragraph (b)(3); substituted “Being consumer driven” for “The department shall be consumer driven” in paragraph (b)(6); and substituted “Encouraging” for “The department shall encourage” in paragraph (b)(7). See editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

49-4A-4.
Purpose of chapter.

It is the purpose of this chapter to establish the department as the agency to administer, supervise, and manage juvenile detention facilities.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 24; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, § 7; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 3-4/HB 242.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “Except for the purposes of administration, supervision, and management as provided in this chapter, juvenile detention facilities shall continue to be detention care facilities for delinquent and unruly children and youth for the purposes of Article 1 of Chapter 11 of Title 15, relating to juvenile courts and juvenile proceedings.” See editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

49-4A-5.
Transfer of functions and employees of Division of Youth Services; personnel administration.

The department shall carry out all functions and exercise all powers relating to the administration, supervision, and management of juvenile detention facilities, and jurisdiction over such juvenile detention facilities is vested in the department.

Any employees of the Department of Juvenile Justice who became so employed by virtue of their transfer from the Division of Youth Services of the Department of Human Resources (now known as the Department of Human Services) on June 30, 1992, shall retain their compensation and benefits and such may not be reduced. Transferred employees who were subject to the state system of personnel administration provided for by Chapter 20 of Title 45 will lose no rights granted under such system as a result of such transfer. Retirement rights of such transferred employees existing under the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia or other public retirement systems on July 1, 1992, shall not be impaired or interrupted by the transfer of such employees and membership in any such retirement system shall continue in the same status possessed by the transferred employees on June 30, 1992. Accrued annual and sick leave possessed by said employees on June 30, 1992, shall be retained by said employees as employees of the department.

The department shall conform to federal standards for a merit system of personnel administration in the respects necessary for receiving federal grants and the board is authorized and empowered to effect such changes as may, from time to time, be necessary in order to comply with such standards.

The department is authorized to employ, on a full-time or part-time basis, such medical, psychiatric, social work, supervisory, institutional, and other professional personnel and such clerical and other employees as may be necessary to discharge the duties of the department under this chapter. The department is also authorized to contract for such professional services as may be necessary.

Classified employees of the department under this chapter shall in all instances be employed and dismissed in accordance with rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board.

All personnel of the department are authorized to be members of the Employees’ Retirement System of Georgia created in Chapter 2 of Title 47. All rights, credits, and funds in that retirement system which are possessed by state personnel transferred by provisions of this chapter to the department, or otherwise had by persons at the time of employment with the department, are continued and preserved, it being the intention of the General Assembly that such persons shall not lose any rights, credits, or funds to which they may be entitled prior to becoming employees of the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 24; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, § 8; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 49; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-22/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-97/HB 642; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 3-5/HB 242.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “state system of personnel administration provided for by Chapter 20 of Title 45 will lose no rights granted under such system as a result of such transfer” for “State Personnel Administration shall retain all existing rights under the State Personnel Administration” in the second sentence of subsection (b); and substituted “State Personnel Board” for “State Personnel Administration” in paragraph (c)(3).

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, substituted “and jurisdiction over such” for “including youth development centers, and jurisdiction over said youth development centers and other” in subsection (a). See editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Request for information, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Juvenile Justice, Rules of General Applicability, § 97-1-.06.

49-4A-6.
Rules and regulations.

The board shall adopt rules and regulations for the government, operation, administration, and maintenance of juvenile detention facilities and may also adopt such other rules and regulations for the government and operation of the department as the board may deem necessary consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

Rules and regulations adopted by the board under subsection (a) of this Code section shall recognize that a primary purpose of juvenile detention facilities is to carry out rehabilitative programs using evidence based programs or practices to the end that children housed in such facilities develop self-respect and self-reliance and acquire the necessary knowledge and skills to become good citizens who are qualified for honorable employment.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 24; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 3-6/HB 242.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, in the middle of subsection (a), deleted “youth development centers and other” following “maintenance of” and deleted “by the department” following “facilities”; and, in subsection (b), deleted “youth development centers and other” following “purpose of”, inserted “using evidence based programs or practices” near the middle, and substituted “children housed in such facilities develop self-respect” for “children and youth housed in said centers shall develop their self-respect”. See editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

49-4A-7.
Powers and duties of department.

The department shall be authorized to:

Accept for detention in a juvenile detention facility any child who is committed to the department under Article 6 of Chapter 11 of Title 15;

Provide probation and other court services for children pursuant to a request from a court under Article 6 of Chapter 11 of Title 15;

Provide casework services and care or payment of maintenance costs for children who have run away from their home communities within this state or from their home communities in this state to another state or from their home communities in another state to this state; pay the costs of returning such runaway children to their home communities; and provide such services, care, or costs for runaway children as may be required under Chapter 4B of Title 49;

Enter into contracts and cooperative agreements with federal, state, county, and municipal governments and their agencies and departments; enter into contracts with public and private institutions and agencies of this and other states; enter into leases with private vendors selected to operate programs on behalf of the department which shall run concurrently with the department’s service contracts; provided, however, that any such lease shall provide that if the property which is the subject of the lease is sold and conveyed during the term of the lease, such lease shall expire by operation of law 90 days after the closing of such sale and conveyance; and enter into contracts with individuals, as may be necessary or desirable in effectuating the purposes of this chapter; and

Solicit and accept donations, contributions, and gifts and receive, hold, and use grants, devises, and bequests of real, personal, and mixed property on behalf of the state to enable the department to carry out its functions and purposes.

When given legal custody over a child for detention in a juvenile detention facility under court order under Article 6 of Chapter 11 of Title 15, the department shall have:

The right of physical possession of such child;

The right and duty to protect, train, and discipline such child;

The responsibility to provide such child with food, clothing, shelter, and education;

The right to determine in which facility such child shall live and to transfer such child as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 42-5-52; and

The right and duty to provide or obtain for such child medical, hospital, psychiatric, surgical, or dental care or services as may be considered appropriate and necessary by competent medical authority without securing prior consent of parents or legal guardians.

The board may authorize the commissioner to enter into contracts and agreements provided for in this Code section subject to the approval of the board or may, through appropriate action of the board, delegate such authority to the commissioner; provided, however, that any contract or agreement that provides services to delinquent children shall be a performance based contract that includes financial incentives or consequences based on the results achieved by the contractor as measured by output, quality, or outcome measures.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-4A-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 24; Ga. L. 1994, p. 304, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 955, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1414, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 128, § 49; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 3-7/HB 242; Ga. L. 2014, p. 763, § 3-2/HB 898.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, substituted “Article 6” for “Article 1” throughout this Code section; in paragraph (a)(1), deleted “youth development center or other” preceding “juvenile detention”; in paragraph (a)(2), deleted “and parole” following “probation”, and deleted “and youth” following “children”; in paragraph (a)(3), deleted “and youths” following “children” three times; in paragraph (a)(4), deleted “leases” following “department which” near the middle; in subsection (b), in the introductory paragraph, deleted “or youth” following “a child”, substituted “juvenile detention” for “youth development center or other”; in paragraphs (b)(1) through (b)(4), substituted “such child” for “the child or youth” ; in paragraph (b)(4), inserted “and to transfer such child as provided in subsection (b) of Code Section 42-5-52”; in paragraph (b)(5), substituted “such child” for “a child or youth” ; and added the proviso at the end of subsection (c). See editor’s note for applicability.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, substituted “Chapter 4B of Title 49” for “Chapter 3 of Title 39” at the end of paragraph (a)(3).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey on administrative law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 1 (2014).